Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
CHAPTER 275 Limited Liability Companies
275.155.
Proper parties to proceedings.

A member of a limited liability company shall not be a proper party to a proceeding by or against a limited liability company, solely by reason of being a member of the limited liability company, except if the object of the proceeding is to enforce a member’s right against or liability to the limited liability company or as otherwise provided in an operating agreement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 31, effective July 15, 1994.

275.160.
Operations outside Kentucky — Kentucky law controlling in cases of conflict.

A limited liability company may conduct its business, carry on its operations, and exercise the power granted by this chapter in any state or in any foreign country.

The personal liability of members, managers, employees, and agents of a limited liability company to any person or in any action or proceeding for the debts, obligations, or liabilities of a limited liability company or for the acts of omissions of other members, managers, employees, or agents of a limited company shall be governed solely and exclusively by this chapter and the laws of this Commonwealth. When a conflict arises between the law of this state and the laws of any other state with regard to the liability of the members of the limited liability company for the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the limited liability company, or of the acts or omissions of other members, managers, employees, or agents of the limited liability company, this Commonwealth’s law shall be deemed to govern in determining the liability.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 32, effective July 15, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

275.165.
Management of company — Delegation of powers — Limitation on remuneration for services performed.

Unless the articles of organization vest management of the limited liability company in a manager or managers, management of the business and affairs of the limited liability company shall vest in the members. Subject to any provisions in the articles of organization, the operating agreement or this chapter restricting or enlarging the management rights and duties of any person or group or class of persons, the members shall have the right and authority to manage the affairs of the limited liability company and to make all decisions with respect thereto.

If the articles of organization vest management of the limited liability company in one (1) or more managers, except to the extent otherwise provided in the articles of organization, the operating agreement, or this chapter, the manager or managers shall have exclusive power to manage the business and affairs of the limited liability company. Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or the operating agreement, managers:

Shall be designated, appointed, elected, removed, or replaced by a vote, approval, or consent of the majority-in-interest of the members;

Shall not be required to be members of the limited liability company or natural persons; and

Unless they are sooner removed or sooner resign, shall hold office until their successors shall have been elected and qualified.

Unless otherwise set forth in a written operating agreement, a member or manager of a limited liability company has the power and authority to delegate to one (1) or more other persons the member’s or manager’s powers to manage or control the business and affairs of the limited liability company, including without limitation the power to delegate to agents and employees of a member, manager, or limited liability company or to delegate by an agreement to other persons. This delegation by a member or manager of a limited liability company shall not cause the member or manager to cease to be a member or manager of the limited liability company.

A member or manager shall not be entitled to remuneration for services performed for the limited liability company except as may be set forth in a written operating agreement.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
33, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, §
27, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 137, §
108, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 108, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 34, § 52, effective June 24, 2015.

275.170.
Duties of care and loyalty — Approval of conflict of interest transactions — Remedy for breach of the duty of loyalty.

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement:

With respect to any claim for breach of the duty of care, a member or manager shall not be liable, responsible, or accountable in damages or otherwise to the limited liability company or the members of the limited liability company for any action taken or failure to act on behalf of the limited liability company unless the act or omission constitutes wanton or reckless misconduct.

The duty of loyalty applicable to each member and manager shall be to account to the limited liability company and hold as trustee for it any profit or benefit derived by that person without the consent of more than one-half (1/2) by number of the disinterested managers, or a majority-in-interest of the members from:

Any transaction connected with the conduct or winding up of the limited liability company; or

Any use by the member or manager of its property, including, but not limited to, confidential or proprietary information of the limited liability company or other matters entrusted to the person as a result of his or her status as manager or member.

In determining whether a transaction has received the approval of a majority-in-interest of the members, membership interests owned by or voted under the control of the member or manager whose actions are under review in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, and membership interests owned by an entity owned by or voted under the control of that member or manager, shall not be counted in a vote of the members to determine whether to consent, and the membership interests shall not be counted in determining whether a quorum, if required by a written operating agreement, exists to consider whether to consent. That a transaction was fair to the limited liability company shall not constitute a defense to the failure to request and receive the required consent of the disinterested managers or members.

A member of a limited liability company in which management is vested in managers under KRS 275.165(2) and who is not a manager shall have no duties to the limited liability company or the other members solely by reason of acting in his or her capacity as a member.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
34, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, §
28, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 137, §
109, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 109, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 133, § 32, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 81, § 106, effective July 12, 2012.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 133, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict; therefore, they have been codified together.

275.172.
Expulsion of member of limited liability company — Conditions.

On application by the limited liability company, a person is expelled as a member by judicial order:

If the person has engaged or is engaging in wrongful conduct that has adversely and materially affected, or will adversely and materially affect, the company’s activities;

If the person has willfully or persistently committed, or is willfully and persistently committing, a material breach of the operating agreement or the person’s duties or obligations under KRS

275.170

;

If the person has engaged or is engaging in conduct relating to the company’s activities which makes it not reasonably practicable to carry on the activities with the person as a member; or

For such other reasons as are set forth in a written agreement.

Upon the effective date of the expulsion, the expelled member shall be dissociated from and cease to be a member of the company and with respect to the expelled member’s limited liability company interest shall be an assignee.

Except as set forth in a written operating agreement, the dissociation of a member in accordance with this section does not entitle the former member or any assignee to any distribution.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 193, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

275.175.
Number of votes required to do business — Circumstances requiring affirmative vote of members — Written operating agreement for company without members — No right of dissent — Written operating agreement provisions relating to right to vote, approve, or consent.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization, a written operating agreement, or this chapter, the affirmative vote, approval, or consent of a majority-in-interest of the members or a simple majority of the managers, each having a single vote, shall be required to decide any matter connected with the business affairs of the limited liability company.

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, irrespective of whether management of the limited liability company is vested in a manager or managers, the affirmative vote, approval, or consent of the members shall be required to:

Amend a written operating agreement;

Authorize a manager or member to do any act on behalf of the limited liability company that contravenes an operating agreement, including any written provision thereof which expressly limits the purpose, business, or affairs of the limited liability company or the conduct thereof;

Amend the articles of organization;

Merge or convert the limited liability company or approve a sale of all or substantially all of its assets;

Admit a new member, including the assignee of a member, as a member;

Remove a member after the assignment of all assignable interest in the limited liability company;

Waive an agreement to contribute to the limited liability company;

Approve the voluntary dissolution of the limited liability company;

Approve any acting contravention of a written operating agreement; or

Allow the voluntary resignation of a member from a manager-managed limited liability company.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization, a written operating agreement, or this chapter, for all purposes of this chapter, the members of a limited liability company shall vote, approve, or consent in proportion to their contributions, based upon the agreed value as stated in the records of the limited liability company as required by KRS

275.185

, made by each member to the extent they have been received by the limited liability company and have not been returned.

In a nonprofit limited liability company that does not have members, the capacity and authority to manage the business and affairs of the company shall be set forth in a written operating agreement.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or the written operating agreement, no member of a limited liability company shall have the right to dissent from an amendment to the operating agreement or the articles of organization.

An operating agreement may set forth provisions relating to notice of the time, place, or purpose of any meeting at which any matter is to be voted on by any members, waiver of any such notice, action by consent without a meeting, the establishment of a record date, quorum, and voting requirements, voting in person or by proxy, or any other matter with respect to the exercise of any such right to vote, approve, or consent.

Except as otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, an action requiring the vote, approval, or consent of the members may be taken without a meeting and without prior notice if the vote, approval, or consent is set forth in a writing approved by not less than the necessary number, percentage, or threshold of members, interests, or votes.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 35, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, § 29, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 137, § 110, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 110, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 106, § 6, effective June 25, 2013; 2015 ch. 34, § 53, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 193, § 12, effective June 29, 2017.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

MacDonald and Seiffert, The Kentucky Limited Liability Company Act: An Analysis Of Applications In Its Second Year, Vol. 60, No. 1, Winter 1996, Ky. Bench & Bar 20.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Rutledge, The Lost Distinction Between Agency and Decisional Authority: Unfortunate Consequences of the Member-Managed versus Manager-Managed Distinction in the Limited Liability Company.,
93 Ky. L.J. 737 (2004/2005).

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

275.177.
Enforcement of limitations on amendment of operating agreement.

If a written operating agreement contains a provision to the effect that any amendment to the operating agreement of the limited liability company shall be in writing and adopted in accordance with the provisions of the operating agreement, then the provision shall be enforceable in accordance with its terms, and any agreement as to the conduct of the business and affairs of the limited liability company which is not in writing and adopted in accordance with the provisions of the operating agreement shall not be considered part of the operating agreement and shall be void and unenforceable.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
15, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 15, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

275.180.
Operating agreement provisions on personal liability and indemnification.

A written operating agreement may:

Eliminate or limit the personal liability of a member or manager for monetary damages for breach of any duty provided for in KRS

275.170

; and

Provide for indemnification of a member or manager for judgments, settlements, penalties, fines, or expenses incurred in a proceeding to which a person is a party because the person is or was a member or manager.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 36, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, § 30, effective July 15, 1998.

275.185.
Required records — Inspection right of member — Limitations upon use of records.

A limited liability company shall keep at its principal office or other location as set forth in a written operating agreement, the following:

A current list, and all past lists, setting forth the full name and last known mailing address of each member and, if any, each manager;

A copy of the articles of organization and all amendments thereto, together with executed copies of any power of attorney pursuant to which any articles of amendment have been executed;

Copies of the limited liability company’s federal, state, and local income tax returns and financial statements, if any, for the three (3) most recent years or, if those returns and statements were not prepared, copies of the information and statements provided to, or which should have been provided to, the members to enable them to prepare their federal, state, and local tax returns for those years;

Copies of any effective written operating agreements and all amendments thereto, and copies of any written operating agreements no longer in effect; and

Unless contained in writing in an operating agreement:

A writing setting forth the amount of cash, if any, and a statement of the agreed value of other property or services, if any, contributed by each member and the times at which or events upon the happening of which any additional contributions are to be made;

A writing stating events, if any, upon the happening of which the limited liability company is to be dissolved and its affairs wound up; and

Other writings, if any, prepared pursuant to a requirement, if any, in an operating agreement.

Subject to subsection (5) of this section, upon reasonable written request to the limited liability company, a member may, at the member’s own expense, inspect and copy during ordinary business hours any limited liability company record, where the record is located or at a reasonable location.

Members, if the management of the limited liability company is vested in the members, or managers, if management of the limited liability company is vested in managers, shall render, to the extent the circumstances render it just and reasonable, true and full information of all matters affecting the members to any member, and the member’s agent, and to the legal representative of any deceased member or of any member under legal disability.

Failure of the limited liability company to keep or maintain any of the records or information required pursuant to this section shall not be grounds for imposing liability on any member or manager for the debts and obligations of the limited liability company.

A written operating agreement may impose reasonable limitations upon the inspection and use of any record of or information with respect to a limited liability company. Except as to limitations set forth in a written operating agreement to which a member requesting information has assented, the limited liability company bears the burden of proof in demonstrating the reasonableness of any restrictions imposed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 37, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, § 111, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 111, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 106, § 7, effective June 25, 2013.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

MacDonald and Seiffert, The Kentucky Limited Liability Company Act: An Analysis Of Applications In Its Second Year, Vol. 60, No. 1, Winter 1996, Ky. Bench & Bar 20.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

275.190.
Annual report.

Each limited liability company and each foreign limited liability company qualified to transact business in this Commonwealth is subject to KRS

14A.6-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
38, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, §
112, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., 2010, ch. 51, §
112, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 151, §
78, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed and reenacted without change to the existing language by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, effective 7/15/10, and repealed and reenacted with the new language by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, effective 1/1/2011. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment by ch. 51 not serve to void amendments made by other bills, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

275.195.
Consideration for issuance of interest — Members.

A limited liability company interest may be issued in exchange for consideration consisting of cash, property, services rendered, or a promissory note or other obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services.

A person may be admitted to a limited liability company as a member of the limited liability company and may receive a limited liability company interest without making a contribution or being obligated to make a contribution to the limited liability company.

Unless otherwise provided in the operating agreement, a person may be admitted to a limited liability company as a member without acquiring a limited liability company interest.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
39, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, §
113, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 113, effective July 15, 2010.

275.200.
Obligation to make contribution — Compromise.

An obligation of a member to make a contribution to the limited liability company shall not be enforceable unless set forth in a writing signed by the member.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement, a member shall be obligated to the limited liability company to perform any enforceable promise to contribute cash or property or to perform services, even if the member is unable to perform because of death, disability, or other reason.

If a member does not make a required contribution of property or services, then the member shall be obligated, at the option of the limited liability company, to contribute cash equal to that portion of value of the stated contribution that has not been made.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement, an obligation of a member to make a contribution may be compromised only with the unanimous consent of the members.

Notwithstanding any compromise approved pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, a creditor of a limited liability company who extends credit or otherwise acts in reliance on an obligation after the member executes a writing which reflects that obligation and before any such compromise is reached, may enforce the original obligation.

History.

Enact. 1994, ch. 389, §
40, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, §
114, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 114, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

MacDonald and Seiffert, The Kentucky Limited Liability Company Act: An Analysis Of Applications In Its Second Year, Vol. 60, No. 1, Winter 1996, Ky. Bench & Bar 20.

Rutledge & Honabach, Kentucky Business Entity Laws: The 2010 Amendments, Vol. 74, No. 5, September 2010, Ky. Bench & Bar 6.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

275.205.
Allocation of profits and losses among members.

Profits and losses of a limited liability company shall be allocated among the members and among classes of members in the manner provided in the operating agreement. If a written operating agreement does not otherwise provide, profits and losses shall be allocated on the basis of the agreed value, as stated in the records of the limited liability company as required by KRS

275.185

, of the contributions made by each member to the extent they have been received by the limited liability company and have not been returned.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 41, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, § 31, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

MacDonald and Seiffert, The Kentucky Limited Liability Company Act: An Analysis Of Applications In Its Second Year, Vol. 60, No. 1, Winter 1996, Ky. Bench & Bar 20.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

275.210.
Distribution of cash or other assets.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

275.310

, distributions of cash or other assets of a limited liability company shall be allocated among the members and among classes of members in the manner provided in writing in an operating agreement. If the operating agreement does not so provide in writing, each member shall share in any distribution on the basis of the agreed value, as stated in the records of the limited liability company as required by KRS

275.185

, of the contributions made by each member to the extent they have been received by the limited liability company and have not been returned. A member shall be entitled to receive distributions described in this section from a limited liability company to the extent and at the times or upon the happenings of the events specified in an operating agreement or at the times determined by the members or managers pursuant to KRS

275.175

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 42, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, § 32, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

MacDonald and Seiffert, The Kentucky Limited Liability Company Act: An Analysis Of Applications In Its Second Year, Vol. 60, No. 1, Winter 1996, Ky. Bench & Bar 20.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

275.215.
Effect of event of disassociation which does not cause dissolution. [Repealed.]

275.220.
Member not entitled to distribution other than in cash — Restriction on in-kind distribution.

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement:

A member, regardless of the nature of the member’s contribution, shall not have a right to demand and receive any distribution from the limited liability company in any form other than cash;

A member shall not be compelled to accept from a limited liability company a distribution of any asset in kind to the extent that the percentage of the asset distributed to the member exceeds the percentage that the member would have shared in a cash distribution equal to the value of the property at the time of distribution; and

The property of a limited liability company shall not be subject to KRS 381.135(1)(a)1.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 44, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, § 33, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 133, § 33, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

MacDonald and Seiffert, The Kentucky Limited Liability Company Act: An Analysis Of Applications In Its Second Year, Vol. 60, No. 1, Winter 1996, Ky. Bench & Bar 20.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

Kentucky Survey Issue: Article: The 2010 Amendments to Kentucky’s Business Entity Laws, 38 N. Ky. L. Rev. 383 (2011).

275.225.
Circumstances preventing distribution — Determination — Definition.

No distribution shall be made if, after giving effect to the distribution:

The limited liability company would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of business;

The limited liability company’s assets would be less than the sum of its liabilities plus, unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement, the amount that would be needed, if the limited liability company were to be dissolved at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights of other members upon dissolution which are superior to the rights of the member receiving the distribution; or

The distribution violates the operating agreement.

The determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection (1) of this section may be based upon:

Financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable under the circumstances; or

A fair valuation or other method that is reasonable under the circumstances.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the effect of a distribution under subsection (1) of this section shall be measured as of:

The date the distribution is authorized if the payment occurs within one hundred twenty (120) days after the date of authorization; or

The date payment is made if it occurs more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date of authorization.

A limited liability company’s indebtedness to a member incurred by reason of a distribution made in accordance with this section shall be at parity with the limited liability company’s indebtedness to its general unsecured creditors, except to the extent subordinated by agreement.

If terms of the indebtedness provide that payment of principal and interest is to be made only if, and to the extent that, payment of a distribution to members could then be made under this section, then indebtedness of a limited liability company, including indebtedness issued as a distribution, shall not be a liability for purposes of determinations made under subsection (1) of this section.

If the indebtedness is issued as a distribution, then each payment of principal or interest on the indebtedness shall be treated as a distribution, the effect of which shall be measured on the date the payment is actually made.

For purposes of this section, the term “distribution” shall not include amounts constituting reasonable compensation for present or past services or reasonable payments made in the ordinary course of business pursuant to a bona fide retirement plan or other benefit program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
45, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, §
115, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 115, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 133, § 34, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 133, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict; therefore, they have been codified together.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

275.230.
Liability for unlawful distribution — Effect of unlawful distribution — Limitation of action.

A member or manager who votes for or assents to a distribution in violation of an operating agreement or KRS

275.225

shall be personally liable to the limited liability company for the amount of the distribution that exceeds the amount that could have been distributed without violating KRS

275.225

or an operating agreement if it is established that the member or manager did not comply with KRS

275.170

.

Each member or manager held liable under subsection (1) of this section for an unlawful distribution shall be entitled to contribution:

From each other member or manager who could be held liable under subsection (1) of this section for the unlawful distribution; and

From each member, assignee, or other recipient for the amount received in violation of KRS

275.225

or an operating agreement.

A proceeding under this section shall be barred unless it is commenced within two (2) years after the date on which the effect of the distribution is measured under KRS 275.225(3).

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 46, effective July 15, 1994; 2012, ch. 81, § 107, effective July 12, 2012.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

275.235.
Member’s rights and remedies when entitled to receive a distribution.

At the time a member becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the member shall have the status of, and shall be entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited liability company with respect to the distribution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 47, effective July 15, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

275.240.
Title to property held by company.

Property transferred to or otherwise acquired by a limited liability company shall be the property of the limited liability company and not of the members individually.

Property may be acquired, held, and conveyed in the name of the limited liability company. Any estate in real property may be acquired in the name of the limited liability company, and title to any interest so acquired shall vest in the limited liability company rather than in the members individually.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 48, effective July 15, 1994.

275.245.
Transfer of property held in name of company.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, property of the limited liability company held in the name of the limited liability company may be transferred by an instrument of transfer executed by any member so authorized in the name of the limited liability company.

If the articles of organization provide that management of the limited liability company is vested in a manager or managers:

Title to property of the limited liability company that is held in the name of the limited liability company may be transferred by an instrument of transfer executed by any manager so authorized in the name of the limited liability company; and

A member, solely by reason of being a member, shall not have authority to transfer property of the limited liability company.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 49, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, § 34, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

275.247.
Sale of assets other than in regular course of business.

Except as may be otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, a limited liability company may sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its property with or without the good will, otherwise than in the usual and regular course of business, on the terms and conditions and for the consideration determined by a majority-in-interest of the members.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or a written operating agreement, no member shall have the right to dissent from a sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition by a limited liability company of all or substantially all of its property outside the ordinary course of business.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
4, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
4, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Dolson, Contractual Dissenters’ Rights for Kentucky LLCs, Volume 75, No. 1, January 2011, Ky. Bench & Bar 18.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

275.250.
Status of company interest as personal property.

A limited liability company interest shall be personal property.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 50, effective July 15, 1994.

275.255.
Assignment of interest.

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement:

A limited liability company interest shall be assignable in whole or in part;

An assignment shall entitle the assignee to receive, to the extent assigned, only the distributions to which the assignor would be entitled;

An assignment of a limited liability company interest shall not dissolve the limited liability company or entitle the assignee to participate in the management and affairs of the limited liability company or to become or exercise any rights of a member other than the right to receive distributions pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section;

Until the assignee of a limited liability company interest becomes a member pursuant to KRS 275.265(1), the assignor shall continue to be a member and to have the power to exercise any rights of a member, subject to the members’ right to remove the assignor pursuant to KRS 275.280(1)(c)2.;

Until an assignee of a limited liability company interest becomes a member, the assignee shall have no liability as a member solely as a result of the assignment; and

The assignor of a limited liability company interest shall not be released from liability as a member solely as result of the assignment.

A written operating agreement may provide that a member’s limited liability company interest may be evidenced by a certificate of limited liability company interest issued by the limited liability company and may also provide for the assignment or transfer of any interest represented by the certificate.

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, the pledge of or granting of a security interest, lien, or other encumbrance in or against any or all of the limited liability company interest of a member shall not constitute an assignment and shall not cause the member to cease to be a member or cease to have the power to exercise any rights or powers of a member.

Limitations upon the assignment or pledge of a membership interest set forth or adopted in accordance with this section shall be enforced notwithstanding KRS

355.9-406

and

355.9-408

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
51, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, §
116, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 116, effective July 15, 2010.